Tennessee, session 114, SB0887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-103, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) The department shall publish the TISA guide on the department's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0887
002402
- 1 -